Washington statutes.
RCW 36.57.050

Chair—General manager.

The authority shall elect a chair, and appoint a general manager who shall be experienced in administration, and who shall act as executive secretary to, and administrative officer for the authority. He or she shall also be empowered to employ such technical and other personnel as approved by the authority. The general manager shall be paid such salary and allowed such expenses as shall be determined by the authority. The general manager shall hold office at the pleasure of the authority, and shall not be removed until after notice is given him or her, and an opportunity for a hearing before the authority as to the reason for his or her removal.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4095; 1974 ex.s. c 167 s 5.]